District of Columbia statutes.
50-409

Rules.

(a)

Within 90 days after September 20, 1990, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Sept. 20, 1990, D.C. Law 8-161, § 10, 37 DCR 4665
Consumer credit sales and direct installment loans, consumer protections, see §§ 28-3801 et seq.
Consumer protection procedures, see § 28-3901 et seq.
Direct motor vehicle installment loans, see § 28-3601 et seq.
Installment sales of motor vehicles, bonding of licensed dealers, see § 50-603 et seq.
This section is referenced in § 50-402 and § 50-405.
1981 Ed., § 40-1809.
Resolution 16-548, the “Commercial Driver’s License and International Registration Plan Enforcement Approval Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective March 7, 2006.
Uniform Classification and Commercial Driver’s License Act of 1990 Conditional Rules Approval Resolution of 1992: Pursuant to Resolution 9-169, effective January 24, 1992, the Council conditionally approved the proposed rules for implementing the Uniform Classification and Commercial Driver’s License Act of 1990.